Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 6051XC (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph l, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 l. (1) One-half unit of computer science commencing with 3 the school year beginning July 1, 2022 . 4 (2) The one-half unit of computer science shall incorporate 5 the standards established pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 6 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), and may be offered online 7 in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to section 256.7, 8 subsection 32 , paragraph âaâ . 9 (3) The one-half unit of computer science may include 10 instruction related to applied sciences, technology, 11 engineering, or manufacturing, including transportation, 12 distribution, logistics, architecture, and construction, which 13 may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework 14 or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements 15 of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph 16 (1), subparagraph division (c). The state board shall adopt 17 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this subparagraph. 18 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 19 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 20 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) The educational standards 21 established in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ , 22 related to the use of instruction related to applied sciences, 23 technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion 24 of the unit requirements related to computer science. 25 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 28 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ , 29 relating to the use of instruction related to applied sciences, 30 technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion 31 of the unit requirements related to computer science in the 32 same manner as a school district. 33